California statutes. Vehicle Code
(a) It is a violation of this code for the holder of any dealer’s license issued under this article to advertise for sale or sell a used vehicle as “certified” or use any similar descriptive term in the advertisement or the sale of a used vehicle that implies the vehicle has been certified to meet the terms of a used vehicle certification program if any of the following apply:

(1) The dealer knows or should have known that the odometer on the vehicle
 does not indicate actual mileage, has been rolled back or otherwise altered to show fewer miles, or replaced with an odometer showing fewer miles than actually driven.

(2) The dealer knows or should have known that the vehicle was reacquired by the vehicle’s manufacturer or a dealer pursuant to state or federal warranty laws.

(3) The title to the vehicle has been inscribed with the notation “Lemon Law Buyback,” “manufacturer repurchase,” “salvage,” “junk,” “nonrepairable,” “flood,” or similar title designation required by this state or another state.

(4) The vehicle has sustained damage in an impact, fire, or flood, that after repair prior to sale substantially impairs the use or safety of the vehicle.

(5) The dealer knows or should have known that the
 vehicle has sustained frame damage.

(6) Prior to sale, the dealer fails to provide the buyer with a completed inspection report indicating all the components inspected.

(7) The dealer disclaims any warranties of merchantability on the vehicle.

(8) The vehicle is sold “AS IS.”

(9) The term “certified” or any similar descriptive term is used in any manner that is untrue or misleading or that would cause any advertisement to be in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 11713 of this code or Section 17200 or 17500 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) A violation of this section is actionable under the Consumers Legal Remedies Act (Title 1.5 (commencing with Section 1750) of Part 4 of
 Division 3 of the Civil Code), the Unfair Competition Law (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), Section 17500 of the Business and Professions Code, or any other applicable state or federal law. The rights and remedies provided by this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting any right or remedy that is otherwise available.

(c) This section does not abrogate or limit any disclosure obligation imposed by any other law.

(d) This section does not apply to the advertisement or sale of a used motorcycle or a used off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification under Section 38010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 128, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Operative July 1, 2006, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.19.

(a) It is unlawful and a violation of this code for the holder of any dealer’s license issued under this article to do any of the following:

(1) Negotiate the terms of a vehicle sale or lease contract and then add charges to the contract for any goods or services without previously disclosing to the consumer the goods and services to be added and obtaining the consumer’s consent.

(2) (A) Inflate the amount of an installment payment or down payment or extend the maturity of a sale or lease contract for the purpose of disguising the actual charges for goods or services to be added by the dealer to the contract.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), “goods or services” means any type of good or service, including, but not limited to, insurance and service contracts.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to the sale or lease of a motorcycle or an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification under Section 38010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 128, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Operative July 1, 2006, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.20.

(a) A dealer that obtains a consumer credit score, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1785.15.1 of the Civil Code, from a consumer credit reporting agency, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1785.3 of the Civil Code, for use in connection with an application for credit initiated by a consumer for the purchase or lease of a motor vehicle for personal, family, or household use, shall provide,
 prior to the sale or lease of the vehicle, the following information to the consumer in at least 10-point type on a document separate from the sale or lease contract:

(1) Each credit score obtained and used by the dealer.

(2) A statement that a consumer report, or a credit report, is a record of the consumer’s credit history and includes information about whether the consumer pays his or her obligations on time and how much the consumer owes to creditors.

(3) A statement that a credit score is a number that takes into account information in a consumer report and that a credit score can change over time to reflect changes in the consumer’s credit history.

(4) A statement that the consumer’s credit score can affect whether the consumer can obtain credit
 and what the cost of that credit will be.

(5) The range of possible credit scores under the model used to generate that credit score.

(6) The distribution of credit scores among consumers who are scored under the same scoring model that is used to generate the consumer’s credit score using the same scale as that of the credit score that is provided to the consumer, presented in the form of a bar graph containing a minimum of six bars that illustrates the percentage of consumers with credit scores within the range of scores reflected in each bar, or by other clear and readily understandable graphical means, or a clear and readily understandable statement informing the consumer how his or her credit score compares to the scores of other consumers. Use of a graph or statement obtained from the person providing the credit score that meets the requirements of this paragraph is deemed
 to comply with this requirement.

(7) The date the credit score was created.

(8) The name of the consumer reporting agency or other person that provided each credit score obtained and used by the dealer.

(9) A statement that the consumer is encouraged to verify the accuracy of the information contained in the consumer report and has the right to dispute any inaccurate information in the report.

(10) A statement that federal law gives the consumer the right to obtain copies of his or her consumer reports directly from the consumer reporting agencies, including a free report from each of the nationwide consumer reporting agencies once during any 12-month period.

(11) Contact information for
 the centralized source from which consumers may obtain their free annual consumer reports.

(12) A statement directing consumers to the Internet Web sites of the Federal Reserve Board and Federal Trade Commission to obtain more information about consumer reports.

(b) Appropriate use by a dealer of the model form described in Section 640.5(e)(5) of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations and contained in Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations Part B, Appendix B, Model Form B-4, as promulgated on January 15, 2010, is deemed to comply with the requirements of this section. Use of the model form is optional.

(c) This section does not apply to the purchase or lease of a motorcycle or an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification under Section 38010.

(d) This section does not limit or restrict any rights or remedies otherwise available under existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 483, Sec. 3.   (SB 1004)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.21.

(a) (1) A dealer shall not sell a used vehicle, as defined in Section 665 and subject to registration under this code, at retail to an individual for personal, family, or household use without offering the buyer a contract cancellation option agreement that allows the buyer to return the vehicle without cause. This section does not apply to a used vehicle having a purchase price of forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or more, a motorcycle, as defined in Section 400, or a recreational vehicle, as defined in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The purchase price for the contract cancellation option shall not exceed the following:

(A) Seventy-five dollars ($75) for a vehicle with a cash price of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less.

(B) One hundred fifty dollars ($150) for a vehicle with a cash price of more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), but not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(C) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a vehicle with a cash price of more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), but not more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).

(D) One percent of the purchase price for a vehicle with a cash price of more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), but less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000).

The term “cash price” as
 used in this paragraph has the same meaning as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2982 of the Civil Code. “Cash price” also excludes registration, transfer, titling, and license fees, the California tire fee, and any charge to electronically register or transfer the vehicle.

(b) To comply with subdivision (a), and notwithstanding Section 2981.9 of the Civil Code, a contract cancellation option agreement shall be contained in a document separate from the conditional sales contract or other vehicle purchase agreement and shall contain, at a minimum, the following:

(1) The name of the seller and the buyer.

(2) A description and the Vehicle Identification Number of the vehicle
 purchased.

(3) A statement specifying the time within which the buyer must exercise the right to cancel the purchase under the contract cancellation option and return the vehicle to the dealer. The dealer shall not specify a time that is earlier than the dealer’s close of business on the second day following the day on which the vehicle was originally delivered to the buyer by the dealer.

(4) A statement that clearly and conspicuously specifies the dollar amount of any restocking fee the buyer must pay to the dealer to exercise the right to cancel the purchase under the contract cancellation option. The restocking fee shall not exceed one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175) if the vehicle’s cash price is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less, three hundred fifty dollars ($350)
 if the vehicle’s cash price is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), and five hundred dollars ($500) if the vehicle cash price is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more. The dealer shall apply toward the restocking fee the price paid by the buyer for the contract cancellation option. The price for the purchase of the contract cancellation option is not otherwise subject to setoff or
 refund.

(5) Notwithstanding paragraph (4), when a buyer, who leased the purchased vehicle immediately preceding the dealer’s sale of the vehicle to the buyer, exercises the contract cancellation option, the limit on the amount of a restocking fee required to be paid by the buyer shall be increased. That increased amount shall be the amount the buyer would have been obligated to pay the lessor, at the time of the termination of the lease, for the following charges, as specified in the lease, and as if the buyer had not purchased the contract cancellation option:

(A) Excess mileage.

(B) Unrepaired damage.

(C) Excess wear and tear.

(6) A statement specifying the maximum number of miles that
 the vehicle may be driven after its original delivery by the dealer to the buyer to remain eligible for cancellation under the contract cancellation option. A dealer shall not specify fewer than 250 miles in the contract cancellation option agreement.

(7) A statement that the contract cancellation option gives the buyer the right to cancel the purchase and obtain a full refund, minus the purchase price for the contract cancellation option agreement; and that the right to cancel will apply only if, within the time specified in the contract cancellation option agreement, the following are personally delivered to the selling dealer by the buyer: a written notice exercising the right to cancel the purchase signed by the buyer; any restocking fee specified in the contract cancellation option agreement minus the purchase price for the contract
 cancellation option agreement; the original contract cancellation option agreement and vehicle purchase contract and related documents, if the seller gave those original documents to the buyer; all original vehicle titling and registration documents, if the seller gave those original documents to the buyer; and the vehicle, free of all liens and encumbrances, other than any lien or encumbrance created by or incidental to the conditional sales contract, any loan arranged by the dealer, or any purchase money loan obtained by the buyer from a third party, and in the same condition as when it was delivered by the dealer to the buyer, reasonable wear and tear and any defect or mechanical problem that manifests or becomes evident after delivery that was not caused by the buyer excepted, and which must not have been driven beyond the mileage limit specified in the contract cancellation option agreement.
 The agreement may also provide that the buyer will execute documents reasonably necessary to effectuate the cancellation and refund and as reasonably required to comply with applicable law.

(8) At the bottom of the contract cancellation option agreement, a statement that may be signed by the buyer to indicate the buyer’s election to exercise the right to cancel the purchase under the terms of the contract cancellation option agreement, and the last date and time by which the option to cancel may be exercised, followed by a line for the buyer’s signature. A particular form of statement is not required, but the following statement is sufficient: “By signing below, I elect to exercise my right to cancel the purchase of the vehicle described in this agreement.” The buyer’s delivery of the purchase cancellation agreement to the dealer with the buyer’s
 signature following this statement shall constitute sufficient written notice exercising the right to cancel the purchase pursuant to paragraph (6). The dealer shall provide the buyer with the statement required by this paragraph in duplicate to enable the buyer to return the signed cancellation notice and retain a copy of the cancellation agreement.

(9) If, pursuant to paragraph (5), the limit on the restocking fee is increased by the amount the buyer, who exercises a contract cancellation option would have been obligated to pay the lessor, upon termination of the lease, for charges for excess mileage, unrepaired damage, or excess wear and tear, as specified in the lease, the dealer shall provide the buyer with a notice of the contents of paragraph (5), including a statement regarding the increased restocking fee.

(c) (1) No later than the second day following the day on which the buyer exercises the right to cancel the purchase in compliance with the contract cancellation option agreement, the dealer shall cancel the contract and provide the buyer with a full refund, including that portion of the sales tax attributable to amounts
 excluded pursuant to Section 6012.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) If the buyer was not charged for the contract cancellation option agreement, the dealer shall return to the buyer, no later than the day following the day on which the buyer exercises the right to cancel the purchase, any motor vehicle the buyer left with the seller as a downpayment or trade-in. If the dealer has sold or otherwise transferred title to the motor vehicle that was left as a downpayment or trade-in, the full refund described in paragraph (1) shall include the fair market value of the motor vehicle left as a downpayment or trade-in, or its value as stated in the contract or purchase order, whichever is greater.

(3) If the buyer was charged for the contract cancellation option agreement,
 the dealer shall retain any motor vehicle the buyer left with the dealer as a downpayment or trade-in until the buyer exercises the right to cancel or the right to cancel expires. If the buyer exercises the right to cancel the purchase, the dealer shall return to the buyer, no later than the day following the day on which the buyer exercises the right to cancel the purchase, any motor vehicle the buyer left with the seller as a downpayment or trade-in. If the dealer has inadvertently sold or otherwise transferred title to the motor vehicle as the result of a bona fide error, notwithstanding reasonable procedures designed to avoid that error, the inadvertent sale or transfer of title shall not be deemed a violation of this paragraph, and the full refund described in paragraph (1) shall include the retail market value of the motor vehicle left as a downpayment or trade-in, or its value as stated in the
 contract or purchase order, whichever is greater.

(d) If the dealer received a portion of the purchase price by credit card, or other third-party payer on the buyer’s account, the dealer may refund that portion of the purchase price to the credit card issuer or third-party payer for credit to the buyer’s account.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a dealer is not required to offer a contract cancellation option agreement to an individual who exercised the individual’s right to cancel the purchase of a vehicle from the dealer pursuant to a contract cancellation option agreement during the immediately preceding 30 days. A dealer is not required to give notice to a subsequent buyer of the return of a vehicle pursuant to this section. This subdivision does not abrogate or limit any
 disclosure obligation imposed by any other law.

(f) This section does not affect or alter the legal rights, duties, obligations, or liabilities of the buyer, the dealer, or the dealer’s agents or assigns, that would exist in the absence of a contract
 cancellation option agreement. The buyer is the owner of a vehicle when the buyer takes delivery of a vehicle until the vehicle is returned to the dealer pursuant to a contract cancellation option agreement, and the existence of a contract cancellation option agreement shall not impose permissive user liability on the dealer, or the dealer’s agents or assigns, under Section 460 or 17150 or otherwise.

(g) This section does not affect the ability of a buyer to rescind the contract or revoke acceptance under any other law.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2012.

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until October 1, 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 10.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of October 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.22.

(a) Upon mutual agreement of the parties to enter into a recreational vehicle franchise, it is unlawful and a violation of this code for a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch licensed under this code to fail or refuse to provide a recreational vehicle dealer with a written recreational vehicle franchise that complies with the requirements of Section 331.3.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 331.3, a recreational vehicle franchise described in this
 section shall include, but not be limited to, provisions regarding dealership transfer, dealership termination, sales territory, and reimbursement for costs incurred by the dealer for work related to the manufacturer’s warranty for each line-make of recreational vehicle covered by the agreement.

(c) This section applies only to a dealer and manufacturer agreement involving recreational vehicles, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, but does not include an agreement with a dealer who deals exclusively in truck campers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 743, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.23.

(a) A recreational vehicle manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch licensed under this code shall not sell a new recreational vehicle in this state to or through a recreational vehicle dealer without having first entered into a written recreational vehicle franchise with that recreational vehicle dealer, that complies with the requirements of Section 331.3 and that has
 been signed by both parties.

(b) A recreational vehicle dealer shall not sell a new recreational vehicle in this state without having first entered into a written recreational vehicle franchise, that complies with the requirements of Section 331.3, with a recreational vehicle manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch licensed under this code, that has been signed by both parties.

(c) (1) A recreational vehicle manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch shall not ship a new recreational vehicle to a recreational dealer on or after January 1, 2009, without a recreational vehicle franchise that has been signed by both parties.

(2) A recreational vehicle dealer shall not receive a new recreational vehicle from a recreational vehicle
 manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch on or after January 1, 2009, without a recreational vehicle franchise that has been signed by both parties.

(d) Any new recreational vehicle inventory that has been purchased by a recreational vehicle dealer, or shipped by a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch, before January 1, 2009, may be sold at any time without a recreational vehicle franchise.

(e) Following the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a recreational vehicle franchise, any new recreational vehicle inventory that was purchased by the recreational vehicle dealer, or shipped by a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch, during the period that the written recreational vehicle franchise was in effect, may be sold by that recreational vehicle dealer at any time. 

(f) This section applies only to a dealer and manufacturer agreement involving recreational vehicles, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, but does not include an agreement with a dealer who deals exclusively in truck campers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 407, Sec. 19.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.25.

(a) A computer vendor shall not do any of the following:

(1) Access, modify, or extract information from a confidential dealer computer record or personally identifiable consumer data from a dealer without first obtaining express written consent from the dealer and without maintaining administrative, technical, and physical safeguards to protect the security, confidentiality, and integrity of the information.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), require a dealer as a condition of doing or continuing to do business, to give express consent to perform the activities specified in paragraph (1).

(B) Express consent may be required as a condition of doing or continuing to do business if the consent is limited to permitting access to personally identifiable consumer data to the extent necessary to do any of the following:

(i) To protect against, or prevent actual or potential fraud, unauthorized transactions, claims, or other liability, or to protect against breaches of confidentiality or security of consumer records.

(ii) To comply with institutional risk control or to resolve consumer disputes or inquiries.

(iii) To
 comply with federal, state, or local laws, rules, and other applicable legal requirements, including lawful requirements of a law enforcement or governmental agency.

(iv) To comply with lawful requirements of a self-regulatory organization or as necessary to perform an investigation on a matter related to public safety.

(v) To comply with a properly authorized civil, criminal, or regulatory investigation, or subpoena or summons by federal, state, or local authorities.

(vi) To make other use of personally identifiable consumer data with the express written consent of the consumer that has not been revoked by the consumer.

(3) Use electronic, contractual, or other means to prevent or interfere with the lawful efforts of a dealer to comply with federal and
 state data security and privacy laws and to maintain the security, integrity, and confidentiality of confidential dealer computer records, including, but not limited to, the ability of a dealer to monitor specific data accessed from or written to the dealer computer system. Waiver of this subdivision or purported consents authorizing the activities proscribed by the subdivision is void.

(b) A dealer shall have the right to prospectively revoke an express consent by providing a 10-day written notice to the computer vendor to whom the consent was provided or on any shorter period of notice agreed to by the computer vendor and the dealer. An agreement that requires a dealer to waive its right to prospectively revoke an express consent is void.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the following terms mean as follows:

(1) “Confidential dealer computer record” means a computer record residing on the dealer’s computer system that contains, in whole or in part, any personally identifiable consumer data, or the dealer’s financial or other proprietary data.

(2) “Computer vendor” means a person, other than a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch, who in the ordinary course of that person’s business configured, sold, leased, licensed, maintained, or otherwise made available to a dealer, a dealer computer system.

(3) “Dealer computer system” means a computer system or computerized application primarily designed for use by and sold to a motor vehicle dealer that, by ownership, lease, license, or otherwise, is used by and in the ordinary course of business of a dealer.

(4) “Express consent” means
 the unrevoked written consent signed by a dealer that specifically describes the data that may be accessed, the means by which it may be accessed, the purpose for which it may be used, and the person or class of persons to whom it may be disclosed.

(5) “Personally identifiable consumer data” means information that is any of the following:

(A) Information of the type specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (e) of Section 1798.83 of the Civil Code.

(B) Information that is nonpublic personal information as defined in Section 313.3(n)(1) of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) Information that is nonpublic personal information as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4052 of the Financial Code.

(d) This section does not limit a duty that a dealer may have to safeguard the security and privacy of records maintained by the dealer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 353, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.26.

(a) A dealer shall not display or offer for sale at retail a used vehicle, as defined in Section 665 and subject to registration under this code, unless the dealer first obtains a NMVTIS vehicle history report from a NMVTIS data provider for the vehicle identification number of the vehicle.

(b) If a NMVTIS vehicle history report for a used vehicle indicates that the
 vehicle is or has been a junk automobile or a salvage automobile or the vehicle has been reported as a junk automobile or a salvage automobile by a junk yard, salvage yard, or insurance carrier pursuant to Section 30504 of Title 49 of the United States Code, or the certificate of title contains a brand, a dealer shall do both of the following:

(1) Post the following disclosure on the vehicle while it is displayed for sale at retail in at least 14-point bold black type, except for the title “Warning” which shall be in at least 18-point bold black type, on at least a 4 x 5.5 inch red background in close proximity to the Federal Trade Commission’s Buyer’s Guide:
“WARNING

According to a vehicle history report issued by the National Motor Vehicle Title Information System (NMVTIS), this vehicle has been
 reported as a total-loss vehicle by an insurance company, has been reported into NMVTIS by a junk or salvage reporting entity, or has a title brand which may materially affect the value, safety, and/or condition of the vehicle. Because of its history as a junk, salvage, or title-branded vehicle, the manufacturer’s warranty or service contract on this vehicle may be affected. Ask the dealer to see a copy of the NMVTIS vehicle history report. You may independently obtain the report by checking NMVTIS online at www.vehiclehistory.gov.”
(2) Provide the retail purchaser with a copy of the NMVTIS vehicle history report upon request prior to sale.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to a used vehicle for which NMVTIS does not have a record if the dealer attempts to obtain a NMVTIS vehicle history report for the vehicle.

(d) As used in this section the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “NMVTIS” means the National Motor Vehicle Title Information System established pursuant to Section 30501 et seq. of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(2) “NMVTIS vehicle history report” means a report obtained by an NMVTIS data provider that contains:

(A) The date of the report.

(B) Any disclaimer required by the operator of NMVTIS.

(C) If available from NMVTIS, information establishing the following:

(i) Whether the vehicle is titled in a particular state.

(ii) Whether the title to the vehicle was branded by a state.

(iii) The validity and status of a document purporting to be a certificate of title for the vehicle.

(iv) Whether the vehicle is or has been a junk automobile or a salvage automobile.

(v) The odometer mileage disclosure required pursuant to Section 32705 of Title 49 of the United States Code for that vehicle on the date the certificate of title for that vehicle was issued and any later mileage information.

(vi) Whether the vehicle has been reported as a junk automobile or a salvage automobile pursuant to Section 30504 of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(3) “Junk
 automobile,” “operator,” and “salvage automobile” shall have the same meanings as defined in Section 25.52 of Title 28 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) “NMVTIS data provider” means a person authorized by the NMVTIS operator as an access portal provider for NMVTIS.

(5) “NMVTIS operator” means the individual or entity authorized or designated as the operator of NMVTIS pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30502 of Title 49 of the United States Code, or the office designated by the United States Attorney General, if there is no authorized or designated individual or entity.

(e) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a NMVTIS data provider from including, in a NMVTIS vehicle history report containing the information required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), additional vehicle history information obtained from
 resources other than NMVTIS.

(f) This section shall not create any legal duty upon the dealer related to the accuracy, errors, or omissions contained in a NMVTIS vehicle history report that is obtained from a NMVTIS data provider or any legal duty to provide information added to NMVTIS after the dealer obtained the NMVTIS vehicle history report pursuant to subdivision (a).

(g) (1) In the event that all NMVTIS data providers cease to make NMVTIS vehicle history reports available to the public, this section shall become inoperative.

(2) In the event that all NMVTIS data providers cease to make NMVTIS vehicle history reports available to the public, it is the intent of the Legislature that the United States Department of Justice notify the Legislature and the department.

(h) This section does not apply to the sale of a recreational vehicle, a motorcycle, or an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification under Section 38010.

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 329, Sec. 17.   (AB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Section operative July 1, 2012, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.27.

(a) A holder of a dealer’s license issued under this article is not in violation of paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 1770 of the Civil Code for excluding from the advertised, displayed, or offered price of a vehicle a fee or charge identified in subdivision (b) of Section 11713.1.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 400, Sec. 10.   (SB 478)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.28.

(a) A motor vehicle manufacturer, or any other person, that advertises a motor vehicle manufacturer’s suggested retail price (MSRP) set by an automobile manufacturer, or lease payments based upon an MSRP, does not, by doing so, violate paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 1770 of the Civil Code.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 400, Sec. 11.   (SB 478)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11714.

(a) The department, upon granting a license, shall issue to the applicant a license containing the applicant’s name and address and the general distinguishing number assigned to the applicant.

(b) A dealer shall not sell any vehicle at retail at a location that is not posted pursuant to Section 11709.

(c) A dealer who is authorized by the department to sell motor vehicles only at wholesale shall not sell any vehicle at retail and shall report every sale to the department as prescribed in subdivision (b) of Section 4456.

(d) When the department has issued a license pursuant to subdivision (a), the licensee may apply for and the department shall issue special plates which shall have displayed thereon the general distinguishing number assigned to the applicant. Each plate so issued shall also contain a
 number or symbol identifying the plate from every other plate bearing a like general distinguishing number.

(e) The department shall also furnish books and forms as it may determine necessary. Those books and forms are and shall remain the property of the department and may be taken up at any time for inspection.

(f) This section shall become operative January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 23) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 90, Sec. 24.   (AB 516)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11715.

(a) A manufacturer, remanufacturer, distributor, or dealer owning or lawfully possessing any vehicle of a type otherwise required to be registered under this code may operate or move the vehicle upon the highways without registering the vehicle upon condition that the vehicle displays special plates issued to the owner as provided in this chapter, in addition to other license plates or permits already assigned and attached to the vehicle in the manner prescribed in Sections 5200 to 5203, inclusive. A vehicle for sale or lease by a dealer
 may also be operated or moved upon the highways without registration for a period not to exceed seven days by a prospective buyer or lessee who is test-driving the vehicle for possible purchase or lease, if the vehicle is in compliance with this condition. The vehicle may also be moved or operated for the purpose of towing or transporting by any lawful method other vehicles.

(b) A transporter may operate or move any owned or lawfully possessed vehicle of like type by any lawful method upon the highways solely for the purpose of delivery, upon condition that there be displayed upon each vehicle in contact with the highway special license plates issued to the transporter as provided in this chapter, in addition to any license plates or permits already assigned and attached to the vehicle in the manner prescribed in Sections 5200 to 5203, inclusive. The vehicles may be used for the purpose of towing or transporting by any lawful method other
 vehicles when the towing or transporting vehicle is being delivered for sale or to the owner thereof.

(c) This section does not apply to any manufacturer, remanufacturer, transporter, distributor, or dealer operating or moving a vehicle as provided in Section 11716.

(d) This section does not apply to work or service vehicles owned by a manufacturer, remanufacturer, transporter, distributor, or dealer. This section does not apply to vehicles owned and leased by dealers, except those vehicles rented or leased to vehicle salespersons in the course of their employment for purposes of display or demonstration, nor to any unregistered vehicles used to transport more than one load of other vehicles for the purpose of sale.

(e) This section does not apply to vehicles currently registered in this state that are owned and
 operated by a licensed dealer when the notice of transfer has been forwarded to the department by the former owner of record pursuant to Section 5900 and when a copy of the notice is displayed as follows:

(1) For a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, the notice is displayed in a conspicuous manner upon the vehicle.

(2) For a vehicle other than a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, the notice is displayed in the lower right-hand corner of the windshield of the vehicle, as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 26708.

(f) Every owner, upon receipt of a registration card issued for special plates, shall maintain the same or a facsimile copy thereof with the vehicle bearing the special plates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 739, Sec. 6.5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11716.

A manufacturer, remanufacturer, transporter, distributor, or dealer, in the course of business, may operate or move any vehicle of a type otherwise required to be registered under this code without registering the vehicle, and without license or special plates attached thereto, from a vessel, railroad depot, or warehouse over the highways to a warehouse or salesroom upon first having obtained a written permit from the department authorizing that operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 45.)
-------------------------------------------

11717.

(a) Every occupational license and special plate issued under this article shall be valid for a period of one year from midnight of the last day of the month of issuance. Except as provided in subdivision (c), renewal of the occupational license and special plates for the ensuing year may be obtained by the person to whom the occupational license and special plates were issued upon application to the department and payment of the fee provided in this code.

(b) Every application for the renewal of an occupational license and special plates which expire pursuant to this
 section shall be made by the person to whom issued not more than 90 days prior to the expiration date, and shall be made by presenting the completed application form provided by the department and by payment of the full annual renewal fee for the occupational license and special plates.
